California statutes. Education Code
(b) Discussion of healthy boundaries for relationships; how to recognize potentially harmful and abusive relationships; and refusal skills to overcome peer pressure and to avoid high-risk
 activities.

(c) Information on sex trafficking and risk factors; the recruiting tactics of sex traffickers and peer recruiters, including recruitment through the Internet; how to report sex trafficking or suspected sex trafficking; and local resources for victims.

(d) Discussion of legal aspects of sexual abuse and sex trafficking under state and federal laws.

(e) Discussion of how culture and mass media influence and desensitize our perceptions of sexual abuse and sex trafficking, including, but not limited to, stereotypes and myths about the victims and abusers, victim blaming, and the role of language. This instruction shall emphasize compassion for people who have suffered from sexual abuse or sex trafficking, and support positive reentry experiences for survivors returning to
 school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

33546.

(a) When the “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised after January 1, 2017, the commission shall consider including comprehensive information for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, on the development of healthy relationships, which shall be age and developmentally appropriate and consistent with the health education standards adopted by the state board.

(b) If the commission includes comprehensive information
 on the development of healthy relationships in the health framework, the commission shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Ensure information included in the health framework is research-based and appropriate for pupils of all races, genders, sexual orientations, gender identities, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds. This may include, but shall not be limited to, reviewing other states’ curricula.

(2) Consult with teachers and educators with expertise in curriculum for developing
 healthy relationships.

(c) For purposes of this section, the “development of healthy relationships” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Understanding the principles of treating one another with respect, dignity, and kindness.

(2) Demonstrating the ability to use interpersonal communication skills to address and resolve disagreement and conflict.

(3) Recognizing when and how to respond to dangerous or other situations that may result in the bullying, harassment, harming, or hurting of another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.   (SB 1435)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

33546.2.

(a) When the health curriculum framework is next revised, on or after January 1, 2025, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider providing for inclusion, in that curriculum framework, content on sextortion.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “sextortion” means a threat to use sexual or intimate images or videos, however obtained, to compel another person to produce sexual or intimate images or videos, engage in sexual acts, or provide anything of value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   (AB 2932)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33546.4.

When the “Health Education Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised, on or after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including information on evidence-based schoolwide programs to support pupils in developing skills in mindfulness, distress tolerance, interpersonal effectiveness, and emotional regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   (AB 3010)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33547.

At the next adoption or followup adoption of instructional materials for use in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, in English Language Arts and English Language Development, the commission shall consider including resources for teachers to help them meet the unique academic and English language development needs of newcomer pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 185, Sec. 1.   (AB 1255)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33547.5.

The commission shall, when the mathematics curriculum framework is next revised after January 1, 2025,
 consider including that pupils in grade 8 be offered the opportunity to take an Algebra I or Mathematics I course that is aligned to the content standards adopted by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.   (SB 1410)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33548.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Artificial Intelligence (AI) literacy” means the knowledge, skills, and attitudes associated with how artificial intelligence works, including its principles, concepts, and applications, as well as how to use artificial intelligence, including its limitations, implications, and ethical considerations.

(2) “Digital citizenship” means a diverse set of skills related to current technology and social media, including the norms of appropriate, responsible, and healthy behavior.

(3) “Media literacy”
 means the ability to access, evaluate, analyze, and use media and information and encompasses the foundational skills that lead to digital citizenship.

(b) When the English language arts/English language development (ELA/ELD) curriculum framework is next revised after January 1, 2024, the commission shall consider incorporating the Model Library Standards developed pursuant to Section 18101. The commission shall also consider incorporating media literacy content at each grade level.

(c) (1) The commission shall consider incorporating media literacy content into the mathematics, science, and history-social science curriculum frameworks when those frameworks are next revised after January 1, 2024.

(2) When ELA/ELD instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including the Model Library Standards, developed pursuant to Section 18101, including media literacy content, in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.

(3) When mathematics, science, and history-social science instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including media literacy content in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.

(d) (1) The commission shall consider incorporating AI literacy content into the mathematics, science, and history-social science curriculum frameworks when those frameworks are next revised after
 January 1, 2025.

(2) When mathematics, science, and history-social science instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including AI literacy in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 927, Sec. 1.   (AB 2876)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Educational Management and Evaluation Commission [33550. - 33556.]

33550.

There is in the state government the Educational Management and Evaluation Commission consisting of a Member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, a Member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one public member appointed by the Governor, and nine public members appointed by the State Board of Education upon the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the members of the State Board of Education.

With respect to the nine public members appointed by the State Board of Education, three members shall represent the field of economics, three members shall represent the learning sciences, and three members shall represent the managerial sciences.

Each public member shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33551.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission pursuant to Section 33550 shall have the powers and duties of a joint legislative committee on the subject of educational management and evaluation and shall meet with, and participate in, the work of the commission to the extent that this participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

33552.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and responsibilities, including travel expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33553.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his representative shall serve as executive secretary to the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33554.

The commission shall select one of its members to be chairman of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33555.

The commission shall assist and advise the State Board of Education in the evaluation of the program achievement of educational programs, in the determination of the relative cost effectiveness of educational programs, and shall make recommendations concerning the expanded use, modification, or replacement of educational programs so as to produce a higher degree of program achievement and cost effectiveness. The commission shall also serve as an advisory body to the State Board of Education on program budgeting and accounting systems for school districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33556.

As used in this article, “commission” means the Educational Management and Evaluation Commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Advisory Commission on Special Education [33590. - 33596.]

33590.

(a) There is in state government the Advisory Commission on Special Education consisting of the following 19 members:

(1) A Member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(2) A Member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(3) Three public members appointed by the Speaker of the
 Assembly, two of whom shall be individuals with a disability or parents of pupils in either a public or private school who have received or are currently receiving special education services due to a disabling condition.

(4) Three public members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, two of whom shall be individuals with a disability or parents of pupils in either a public or private school who have received or are currently receiving special education services due to a disabling condition.

(5) Four public members appointed by the Governor, two of whom shall be parents of pupils in either a public or private school who have received or are currently receiving special education services due to a disabling condition.

(6) Five public members appointed by the State Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the Superintendent or the members of the State Board of Education, three of whom shall be parents of pupils in either a public or private school who have received or are currently receiving special education services due to a disabling condition, and one of whom shall be a representative of the charter school community.

(7) Two members appointed by the commission, both of whom shall be pupils with exceptional needs, 16 to 22 years of age, inclusive.

(b) (1) Each member shall be selected to ensure that the commission is representative of the state population and composed of individuals involved in, or concerned with, the education of children with disabilities, including parents of children with disabilities, ages birth to 26 years, inclusive; individuals with disabilities; teachers; representatives of higher education that prepare special education and related services personnel; state and local education officials, including, but
 not limited to, officials who carry out activities under Part B (commencing with Section 11431, et seq.) of Subchapter VI of Title 42 of the United States Code; administrators of programs for children with disabilities; representatives of other state agencies involved in the financing or delivery of related services to children with disabilities; representatives of private schools and public charter schools; at least one representative of a vocational community or business organization concerned with the provision of transition services to children with disabilities; and a representative from the State Department of Social Services responsible for foster care; and representatives from the state juvenile and adult corrections agencies.

(2) Each member shall be knowledgeable about the wide variety of disabling conditions that
 require special programs in order to achieve the goal of providing an appropriate education to all eligible pupils.

(3) A majority of the members of the commission shall be individuals with disabilities or parents of children with disabilities who are ages birth to 26 years, inclusive.

(c) The commission shall select one of its members to be chairperson of the commission. In addition to other duties, the chairperson shall notify the appointing bodies when a vacancy occurs on the commission and of the type of representative listed in subdivision (b) who is required to be appointed to fill the vacancy.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the term of each public member is four years.

(2) The term of each pupil appointed pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) is one year, with the option to serve a second term of one year.

(e) A public member may not serve more than two terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 917, Sec. 1.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

33591.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission pursuant to Section 33590 shall have the powers and duties of a joint legislative committee on the subject of special education and shall meet with, and participate in, the work of the commission to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33592.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except they shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and responsibilities, including traveling expenses.

Reimbursement of other expenses, which are determined to be necessary for the commission to function, but do not exceed the commission’s budget, may be approved by the commission and the executive secretary to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1201, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

33593.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction or the superintendent’s designee shall serve as executive secretary to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

33595.

(a) The commission shall study and provide assistance and advice to the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Legislature, and the Governor in new or continuing areas of research, program development, and evaluation in special education. The commission shall also do the following:

(1) Comment publicly on any rules or regulations proposed by the state regarding the education of individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026.

(2) Advise the Superintendent of Public Instruction in developing evaluations and reporting on data to the Secretary of Education in the United States Department of Education under Section 1418 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(3) Advise the Superintendent of Public Instruction in developing corrective action plans to address findings identified in federal monitoring reports under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(4) Advise the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the State Board of Education in developing and implementing policies relating to the coordination of services for individuals with exceptional needs.

(b) The commission shall report to the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Legislature, and the Governor not less than once a year on the following with respect to special education:

(1) Activities enumerated in Section 56100 that are necessary to be undertaken regarding special education for individuals with exceptional needs.

(2) The priorities and procedures utilized in the distribution of federal and state funds.

(3) The unmet educational needs of individuals with exceptional needs within the state.

(4) Recommendations relating to providing better education services to individuals with exceptional needs, including, but not limited to, the development, review, and revision, of the definition of “appropriate” as that term is used in the phrase “free and appropriate public education” for the purposes of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(c) Commission recommendations or requests shall be transmitted by letter from the commission chairperson to the president of the State Board of Education. Each communication shall be placed on the agenda of the next forthcoming state board meeting in accordance with the announced annual state board agenda cutoff dates. Following the state board meeting, the commission shall be notified by the state board as to what action has been taken on each request. Commission requests shall also be transmitted by letter from the commission chairperson to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Governor, and to appropriate Members of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

33596.

As used in this article, “commission” means the Advisory Commission on Special Education. The commission shall also serve as the State Advisory Panel required by paragraph (21) of subdivision (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Office of Civil Rights [33800. - 33804.]

33800.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) “Office” means the Office of Civil Rights established pursuant to Section 33801.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33801.

(a) The Office of Civil Rights is hereby established under the administration of the Government Operations Agency.

(b) The Director of the Office of Civil Rights shall be appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(c) The purpose of the office is to work directly with local educational agencies to prevent and address discrimination and bias pursuant to Section 220.

(d) The office shall engage with and seek advice from coordinators established under this chapter on actions implemented by this office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33802.

The Office of Civil Rights, in consultation with the department, and under the supervision of the Government Operations Agency, shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide education and educational resources to identify and prevent antisemitism and other forms of discrimination and bias, and share relevant laws and regulations with educational state agencies, local educational agencies, and community stakeholders.

(b) Annually submit a report to the Government Operations Agency, the Superintendent, the executive director of the state board, and the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the state of discrimination and bias in all local educational agencies serving
 pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The report shall include specific information on the type of discrimination or bias against a group protected by Section 220. The report shall be made publicly available on the agency’s internet website.

(c) Recommend strategies to combat discrimination or bias against groups protected by Section 220 in local educational agencies serving pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to the department and local educational agencies, including proactive strategies using a restorative justice approach with a focus on repairing harm, fostering empathy, and healing relationships.

(d) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, annually review a report that the department shall provide to the Office of Civil Rights that includes a summary of all
 complaints made pursuant to Section 33315 that involve discrimination as defined in Section 220. The summary shall include specific information on the type of discrimination or bias against groups protected by Section 220, any action taken by the department in response to each complaint and the timeline for that action, and the disposition of each complaint.

(2) Advise on subsequent action regarding complaints made pursuant to Section 33315 that involve discrimination as defined in Section 220, including either or both of the following:

(A) Provide advice to the department and the relevant county office of education, if appropriate, to implement corrective actions that may include, but not be limited to, targeted and intensive assistance for teachers, administrators and staff to identify and proactively prevent antisemitism and other forms of discrimination and bias and on
 restorative justice practices.

(B) Provide technical assistance to teachers, administrators, governing board or body members or other school staff, upon the request of the Superintendent, district superintendent, county superintendent of schools, or the governing board or body of a local educational agency, in order to resolve discrimination issues at schoolsites.

(e) (1) Provide assistance, in consultation with the office of the Attorney General and the department, on proper protocols to respond to discrimination complaints filed pursuant to Section 33315.

(2) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the office shall develop a training module, in consultation with the department, the executive director of the state board, and the office of the Attorney General, regarding
 the appropriate manner to process and resolve discrimination complaints filed pursuant to Section 33315. The training module shall include, but not be limited to, information on timelines, appeals, and protocols regarding the interaction with pupils, parents, and school staff, in resolving complaints in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33803.

It is the intent of the Legislature to enact future legislation to do both of the following:

(a) Establish coordinators to be employed within the office to prevent and address discrimination and bias.

(b) Enact the duties and responsibilities of the coordinators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33803.1.

(a) The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Antisemitism Prevention Coordinator who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

(b) The Antisemitism Prevention Coordinator, in consultation with the department, and under the supervision of the Government Operations Agency, shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop, consult on, and provide antisemitism education to teachers, staff, governing board or body members, administrators, and other local educational agency personnel to identify and proactively prevent antisemitism.

(2) Make recommendations, in coordination with the executive
 director of the state board, to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on legislation necessary for the prevention of antisemitism in educational settings.

(3) Engage and advise on the actions taken by the office on issues relating to antisemitism and the Jewish community.

(4) Engage with local educational agencies on the handling of antisemitism.

(5) Beginning September 1, 2027, track and report to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the executive director of the state board, and the Superintendent complaints and resolutions or lack of resolutions of complaints made pursuant to Section 33315 relating to antisemitism in all local educational agencies serving pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(6) Engage with relevant community stakeholders, as determined by the Antisemitism Prevention Coordinator, in the execution of their duties.

(c) The United States National Strategy to Counter Antisemitism, published by the Biden Administration on May 25, 2023, shall be a basis to inform the Antisemitism Prevention Coordinator on how to identify, respond to, prevent, and counter antisemitism.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33803.2.

The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Religious Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 429, Sec. 1.   (SB 48)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33803.3.

The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Race and Ethnicity Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 429, Sec. 2.   (SB 48)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33803.4.

The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Gender Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 429, Sec. 3.   (SB 48)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33803.5.

The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the LGBTQ Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 429, Sec. 4.   (SB 48)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33804.

The reports or summaries required pursuant to this chapter shall not contain any personally identifying information about any individual, and the information in the report shall be sufficiently deidentified to prevent the identification of the individuals involved in the complaint. The underlying data shall be confidential and protected from public disclosure, including disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except that the information may be disclosable to the same extent as the data was disclosable by the entity that collected the data.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 3. LOCAL ADMINISTRATION [35000. - 45500.]



  PART 21. LOCAL EDUCATIONAL AGENCIES [35000. - 35787.]



  CHAPTER 1. School Districts [35000. - 35046.]



  ARTICLE 1. Naming [35000. - 35001.1.]

35000.

(a) The first governing board of any new school district shall, at the first meeting of the governing board or as soon as practicable thereafter, name the school district.

(b) The name of an elementary school district shall be in the form of “____ District” (using the name of the district). The name of an elementary school district shall not include a number.

(c) The name of a unified school district shall be in the form of “____ Unified School District” (using the name of the district). A number shall not be used as a part of the designation of any unified school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 6.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35001.

(a) Whenever a petition is presented to the governing board of a school district, signed by at least 15 qualified electors of that school district, asking that the name of the district be changed and stating the new name requested, the governing board shall designate a day upon which it will act upon the petition, which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 40 days after the receipt of the petition.

The governing board shall give or cause to be given notice to all parties interested by publication in a newspaper published within the school district, or, if there is none, in any newspaper published in the county, of the time set for the hearing of the petition. The notice shall be published at least twice before the day set for hearing. At the hearing the board shall by resolution either grant or deny the petition, and, if granted, shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the change of the name of the district. The board shall also certify the name change to the county elections official of each county in which any part of the school district is situated. The name change shall also be entered in the records of the governing board.

(b) As an alternative to the procedures set forth in subdivision (a), a petition may be presented to the superintendent of schools having jurisdiction of any high school district signed by at least two-thirds of the members of the governing board of the high school district asking that the name of the district be changed and stating the new name desired. The procedure shall thereafter be the same as is provided for electors’ petitions in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35001.1.

Notwithstanding Section 35001, the Richmond Unified School District is hereby renamed and shall be known as the “West Contra Costa Unified School District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 57, Sec. 3.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [35010. - 35012.]

35010.

(a) Every school district shall be under the control of a board of school trustees or a board of education.

(b) The governing board of each school district shall prescribe and enforce rules not inconsistent with law, or with the rules prescribed by the State Board of Education, for its own government.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

35012.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the governing board of a school district shall consist of five regular members elected at large by the qualified voters of the school district. The terms of the regular members shall, except as otherwise provided, be for four years and staggered so that as nearly as practicable one-half of the regular members shall be elected in each odd-numbered year.

(b) A unified school district may have a governing board of seven regular members if the proposal for unification has specified a governing board of seven regular members. The regular members of the governing board of a unified school district shall be elected at large or by trustee areas as
 designated in the proposal for unification and shall serve four-year terms of office.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and except as provided in this subdivision and Section 5018, the governing board of an elementary school district other than a union or joint union elementary school district shall consist of three regular members selected at large from the territory comprising the school district. Whenever, in any such elementary school district, the average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year is 300 or more, the procedures prescribed by Section 5018 shall be undertaken.

(d) (1) There may be submitted to the governing board of a school district maintaining one or more high schools a pupil petition requesting the governing board to appoint one
 or more pupil members to the governing board pursuant to this section.

(2) The petition shall contain the signatures of either (A) not less than 500 pupils regularly enrolled in high schools of the school district, or (B) not less than 10 percent of the number of pupils regularly enrolled in high schools of the school district, whichever is less. Each fiscal year, and within 60 days of receipt of a petition for pupil representation, or at its next regularly scheduled meeting if no meeting is held within those 60 days, the governing board of a school district shall order the inclusion within the membership of the governing board, in addition to the number of regular members otherwise prescribed, at least one pupil member. The governing board of a school district may order the inclusion of more than one pupil member.

(3) Upon receipt of a petition for pupil representation, the governing board of a school district shall, commencing July 1, 1976, and each year thereafter, order the inclusion within the membership of the governing board, in addition to the number of
 regular members otherwise prescribed, at least one pupil member. The governing board of a school district may order the inclusion of more than one pupil member. The governing board of a school district may appoint a pupil to serve as an alternate pupil member who would fulfill all duties and have the same rights as a pupil member if the governing board of a school district determines the pupil member is not fulfilling their duties. If the governing board of a school district appoints an alternate pupil member, the governing board shall suspend the prior pupil member’s rights and privileges related to service on the governing board.

(4) (A) A pupil member of the governing board of a school district shall have preferential voting rights.

(B) Preferential voting, as used in this section, means a formal expression of opinion that is recorded in the minutes and cast before the official vote of the governing board of the school district. A preferential vote shall not serve in determining the final numerical outcome of a vote. No preferential vote shall be solicited on matters subject to closed session discussion.

(5) The governing board of the school district may adopt a resolution authorizing the pupil member or members to make motions that may be acted upon by the governing board, except on matters dealing with employer-employee relations pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(6) (A) Each pupil member shall have the
 right to attend each and all meetings of the governing board of the school district, except closed sessions.

(B) (i) Each pupil member shall be appointed to subcommittees of the governing board in the same manner as regular members.

(ii) Each pupil member shall be made aware of the time commitment required to participate in subcommittee meetings and work, and may decline an appointment to a subcommittee.

(iii) Subcommittee meetings may be scheduled in accordance with the availability of all members, including each pupil member.

(7) Any pupil selected to serve as a pupil member of the governing board of a school district shall be enrolled in a high school
 of the school district, may be less than 18 years of age, and shall be chosen by the pupils enrolled in the high school or high schools of the school district in accordance with policies and procedures prescribed by the governing board. The term of a pupil member shall be one year, commencing on July 1 of each year, except that the term of a pupil member may be adjusted only in cases where a vacancy occurs or to provide more pupils with an opportunity to serve on the governing board.

(8) A pupil member shall be entitled to the mileage allowance to the same extent as regular members, and may receive compensation as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 35120.

(9) (A) A pupil member shall be seated with the regular members of the governing board of the school
 district, and shall be recognized as a full member of the governing board at the meetings, including receiving all open meeting materials presented to the regular members at the same time the materials are presented to the regular members, being invited to staff briefings of regular members or being provided a separate staff briefing within the same timeframe as the staff briefing of regular members, being invited to attend other functions of the governing board of the school district, such as forums, meetings with pupils and parents, and other general assemblies, and participating in the questioning of witnesses and the discussion of issues.

(B) A pupil member shall also receive all materials received by regular members between open meetings, except for materials that pertain to closed session items.

(C) (i) The governing board of the school district may authorize the pupil member or members to make restorative justice recommendations that may be considered by the governing board of the school district in closed session expulsion hearings. If the governing board of the school district authorizes pupil recommendations in expulsion hearings, then notwithstanding subparagraph (B), the governing board of the school district shall disclose limited case information that pertains to closed session items to the pupil member or members to allow the pupil member or members to make those recommendations.

(ii) Disclosure of case information to the pupil member or members pursuant to clause (i) shall be conditioned on the voluntary, written consent of the pupil who is
 subject to the expulsion hearing and the pupil’s parent or guardian, and shall be consistent with federal and state privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and any implementing federal regulations.

(10) The pupil member shall not be included in determining the vote required to carry any measure before the governing board of the school district.

(11) The pupil member shall not be liable for any acts of the governing board of the school district.

(12) A majority vote of all voting regular members shall be required to approve a motion to eliminate the pupil member position from the governing board of a school district. The motion